Oklahoma, session 2026, HB4350.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:
SECTION 1. AMENDATORY 82 O.S. 2021, Section 1020.19, is
amended to read as follows:
Section 1020.19. Upon request of a majority of the landowners
residing within a A. To encourage groundwater conservation,
beginning January 1, 2027, the Oklahoma Water Resources Board shall
provide a five-year flex allocation of groundwater usage based off
the previously determined allocated annual use of the basin or
subbasin, the Board is authorized to require that water wells be
metered and that such meters as the Board shall approve be utilized
Req. No. 14750 Page 1

by t he applicant and placed under seal, subject to reading by the
agents of the Board at any time. The Board may also require that
the applicant report the reading of such meters at reasonable
intervals. A five-year flex allocation shall not require a new
permit for existing permit holders. A five-year flex allocation
shall be available for:
1. Existing permit holders for groundwater use permits in
basins or subbasins, based upon the maximum annual yield
determination at the time of the original application;
2. New applicants for groundwater use permits in basins or
subbasins based upon the current maximum annual yield determination;
and
3. New and existing applicants and temporary permit holders for
groundwater use permits in basins or subbasins where the maximum
annual yield has yet to be determined.
B. An applicant for a five-year flex allocation shall be
required to:
1. Submit an annual usage report of the prior year's usage from
a Board-approved water measurement system; and
2. Pay the annual groundwater permit fee.
C. A five-year flex allocation shall allow the permit holder to
exceed the determined annual allocation in any year of the five-year
allocation; provided, that the applicant shall adhere to the
cumulative annually determined allocation of the basin or subbasin
Req. No. 14750 Page 2

over the five-year period. The permit holder shall not exceed the
permitted annual allocation by over two hundred percent (200%) in
any of the five (5) years.
D. Nothing in this section shall apply to domestic wells.
SECTION 2. This act shall become effective November 1, 2026.

60-2-14750 JBH 12/18/25

















Req. No. 14750 Page 3